Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.160

Commercial pesticide applicator license—Financial responsibility.

The director shall not issue a commercial pesticide applicator license until the applicant has furnished evidence of financial responsibility.

(1) Evidence of financial responsibility shall consist of either a surety bond; or a liability insurance policy or certification thereof, protecting persons who may suffer legal damages as a result of the operations of the applicant. The surety bond or liability insurance policy need not apply to damages or injury to agricultural crops, plants or land being worked upon by the applicant. The director shall not accept a surety bond or liability insurance policy except from authorized insurers in this state or if placed as a surplus line as provided for in chapter 48.15 RCW.

(2) Evidence of financial responsibility shall be supplied to the department on a financial responsibility insurance certificate or surety bond form (blank forms supplied by the department to the applicant).

[ 1994 c 283 s 19; 1989 c 380 s 49; 1967 c 177 s 9; 1961 c 249 s 16.]